Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2414
Association; fees and taxes; exempt.

The association shall be exempt from the payment of all fees and all taxes levied by this state or any of its subdivisions except taxes levied on real or personal property.

Laws 1971, LB 722, § 14.